Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4148.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 320.350 is amended to read:
320.350. (1) A unit of local government that did not impose a local transient lodging tax on July
1, 2003, may not impose a local transient lodging tax on or after July 2, 2003, unless the imposition
of the local transient lodging tax was approved on or before July 1, 2003.
(2) A unit of local government that imposed a local transient lodging tax on July 1, 2003, may
not increase the rate of the local transient lodging tax on or after July 2, 2003, to a rate that is
greater than the rate in effect on July 1, 2003, unless the increase was approved on or before July
1, 2003.
(3) A unit of local government that imposed a local transient lodging tax on July 1, 2003, may
not decrease the percentage of total local transient lodging tax revenues that are actually expended
to fund tourism promotion or tourism-related facilities on or after July 2, 2003. A unit of local gov-
ernment that agreed, on or before July 1, 2003, to increase the percentage of total local transient
lodging tax revenues that are to be expended to fund tourism promotion or tourism-related facilities,
must increase the percentage as agreed.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a unit of local government that is
financing debt with local transient lodging tax revenues on November 26, 2003, must continue to
finance the debt until the retirement of the debt, including any refinancing of that debt. If the tax
is not otherwise permitted under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, at the time of the debt retire-
ment:
(a) The local transient lodging tax revenue that financed the debt shall be used as provided in
subsection (5) of this section; or
(b) The unit of local government shall thereafter eliminate the new tax or increase in tax oth-
erwise described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section.
(5) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to a new or increased local transient
lodging tax if all of the net revenue from the new or increased tax, following reductions attributed
to collection reimbursement charges, is used consistently with subsection (6) of this section to:
(a) Fund tourism promotion, [or] tourism-related facilities or resiliency grants for small
businesses in the restaurant and lodging industry;
Enrolled House Bill 4148 (HB 4148-A) Page 1

(b) Fund city or county services, whether emergency or nonemergency services, provided
directly by the city or county or by a special district in lieu of the city or county; or
(c) Finance or refinance the debt of tourism-related facilities and pay reasonable administrative
costs incurred in financing or refinancing that debt, provided that:
(A) The net revenue may be used for administrative costs only if the unit of local government
provides a collection reimbursement charge; and
(B) Upon retirement of the debt, the unit of local government reduces the tax by the amount
by which the tax was increased to finance or refinance the debt.
(6)(a) At least [70] 50 percent of net revenue from a new or increased local transient lodging
tax shall be used for the purposes described in subsection (5)(a) or (c) of this section.
(b) No more than [30] 50 percent of net revenue from a new or increased local transient lodging
tax may be used for the purpose described in subsection (5)(b) of this section.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a unit of local government may use
unexpended net revenue collected before the effective date of this 2026 Act from a new tax
described in subsection (1) of this section in accordance with subsection (6) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a unit of local government may use
unexpended net revenue collected before the effective date of this 2026 Act that is attribut-
able to the rate of the local transient lodging tax in effect on July 1, 2003, and to any increase
in the rate made on or after July 2, 2003, in accordance with subsection (6) of this section.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, a unit of local government may, in
accordance with subsection (6) of this section, decrease the percentage of total local tran-
sient lodging tax revenues that are actually expended to fund tourism promotion or
tourism-related facilities regardless of when the percentage went into effect.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 320.350 by section 1 of this 2026 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 320.350 by section 1 of this 2026 Act apply to net
revenue collected by units of local government before, on or after the effective date of this
2026 Act.
SECTION 4. (1)(a) A unit of local government that imposes a local transient lodging tax
under ORS 320.345 to 320.365 shall file a biennial report with the Legislative Revenue Officer
no later than September 1 of each odd-numbered year, beginning in 2027.
(b) Upon request by one or more cities or counties, the League of Oregon Cities or the
Association of Oregon Counties, respectively, may file the report on behalf of the cities or
counties.
(2) The report must include the following information with respect to total transient
lodging tax revenue:
(a) For the preceding two fiscal years:
(A) The tax rates imposed, setting forth separately those rates that were imposed or in-
creased on or before July 1, 2003, and those rates that were imposed or increased on or after
July 2, 2003;
(B) Total revenue collected;
(C) The amount and percentage of revenue used to fund tourism promotion, including
revenue expended under agreements with destination management organizations;
(D) The amount and percentage of revenue used to fund tourism-related facilities;
(E) The amount and percentage of revenue used to fund resiliency grants for small
businesses in the restaurant and lodging industry; and
(F) The amount and percentage of revenue used to fund city or county services;
(b) The amount of revenue held in capital reserves, with a description of its intended
purpose;
(c) Any changes to allocation methods or use definitions, including those approved by the
voters or unit of local government; and
(d) A summary of advisory board meetings or oversight actions, if applicable.
Enrolled House Bill 4148 (HB 4148-A) Page 2

(3)(a) Any destination management organization or other entity receiving local transient
lodging tax revenue under an agreement entered into with a unit of local government shall
submit a biennial report to the unit of local government for inclusion in the biennial report
required under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A report required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall include a description
of:
(A) The uses of the local transient lodging tax revenue received under the terms of the
agreement, including, but not limited to, marketing, staffing and grants;
(B) Performance metrics of tourism promotion, including campaigns executed and audi-
ences reached; and
(C) Compliance with the terms of the agreement and key deliverables satisfied.
(4) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall submit an aggregate summary of reports re-
ceived under subsection (1) of this section for each biennium, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue, economic
development and local government.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2041.
SECTION 6. (1) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a study of the percentage
requirements for allowable uses of local transient lodging tax revenue under ORS 320.350 (6),
as amended by section 1 of this 2026 Act.
(2) The study shall discuss the following, separately and under such further detailed
headings as the Legislative Revenue Officer considers useful:
(a) The amount and percentage of revenue used to fund tourism promotion, including
revenue expended under agreements with destination management organizations;
(b) The amount and percentage of revenue used to fund tourism-related facilities;
(c) The amount and percentage of revenue used to fund resiliency grants for small busi-
nesses in the restaurant and lodging industry; and
(d) The amount and percentage of revenue used to fund city or county services.
(3)(a) In conducting the study, the Legislative Revenue Officer may consult with inter-
ested stakeholders.
(b) Units of local governments shall provide the Legislative Revenue Officer with the data
and other information necessary to conduct the study, including tax collections and expend-
itures.
(c) The Legislative Revenue Officer may use any information received under section 4
of this 2026 Act for purposes of the study required under this section.
(4) Not later than September 15, 2034, the Legislative Revenue Officer shall submit, in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to revenue, a report of the findings of the study.
SECTION 7. Section 6 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2036.
SECTION 8. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4148 (HB 4148-A) Page 3

Passed by House February 25, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4148 (HB 4148-A) Page 4